Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 5 Rotary Funds

35-5-1.
Establishment — Rules and regulations.

The director of administration may establish in any state department or agency a system of rotary or rotating funds for petty cash payments and for the purpose of paying such accounts as may in the judgment of the director be desirable. The director may make rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, to more effectually provide for the operation of rotary or rotating funds, and may change any rules and regulations from time to time when in the opinion of the director it is necessary or advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 981, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 45; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-5-1

; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 9, § 3.

35-5-2.
Disbursing officers — Bonds.

Any state department or agency, with the approval of the director, may appoint one or more disbursing officers who shall have the custody and full charge of, and be responsible for the proper disposition of, funds. Every disbursing officer so appointed shall furnish bonds running to the state for such a sum and with such sureties as may be approved by the general treasurer, and all bonds shall be deposited with the general treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 981, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 46; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-5-2

.

35-5-3.
Payments from treasury for establishment of funds.

For the purpose of providing from time to time moneys for the establishment of rotary funds, a sum sufficient is hereby appropriated out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, and the proper officer of any state department or agency may present a voucher to the director of administration payable to the disbursing officer for such sum as may be necessary, and, when approved by the director, the state controller shall draw his or her order upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sums as may be from time to time required, and the sums shall be charged to the state department or agency presenting the voucher.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 981, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 47; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-5-3

.

35-5-4.
Funds property of state — Withdrawal by general treasurer.

All moneys deposited in any bank or trust company as rotary or rotating funds by any disbursing officer shall be held as the property of the state subject to the order of the disbursing officer depositing the money, and shall also be subject to the order of and shall be withdrawn by the general treasurer at any time upon request of the director of administration; and when so withdrawn the moneys shall be credited to the appropriation to which the moneys were originally charged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 981, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 48; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-5-4

.

35-5-5.
Monthly accounts of disbursing officers — Reimbursement of funds.

Every disbursing officer shall at the end of each month render to the state controller a statement, in the form prescribed by the controller, together with duly authenticated vouchers, covering expenditures from the funds for each month, and when approved by the state controller, the disbursing officer shall draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the amount necessary to reimburse each fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 981, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 49; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-5-5

.

35-5-6.
Payment of salaries and wages from funds — Reimbursement from treasury.

When authorized by any state department or agency approved by the director of administration, any disbursing officer shall also have charge of the payment of salaries and wages of officers and employees of the department or agency, and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sums as may from time to time be required, within the amounts appropriated therefor, upon receipt by him or her of payrolls properly attested, accompanied by orders approved in a manner satisfactory to the controller.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 981, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 50; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-5-6

.

35-5-7.
Repayment of funds to treasury — Accounting.

Whenever the director of administration shall so request in writing, any disbursing officer shall turn over to the general treasurer any balance remaining in his or her custody or subject to his or her order, accounting at the same time to the controller for the full amount of the rotary fund given originally into his or her custody, and the general treasurer shall credit the balances, when so turned over, to the appropriation to which the rotary fund was originally charged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 981, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 51; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-5-7

.

35-5-8.
Reimbursement of general store fund for purchases by state agencies.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

35-5-5

, any rotary or rotating fund established for the general store at the state institutions at Cranston, under the control of the department of corrections, shall consist of, in addition to such sums as may be provided by appropriation for that purpose, the receipts and reimbursements accruing to the fund, and the inventory value at cost of goods, wares, and merchandise on hand in the general store. Any state department or agency receiving or drawing goods, wares, or merchandise from the general store, or receiving benefits therefrom, shall reimburse the rotary fund for the cost. The reimbursement of the rotary fund shall be made by each department or agency at the close of each calendar month by approving and forwarding to the state controller in the manner provided by law vouchers payable to the order of the general store rotary fund. The state controller shall charge the vouchers to the proper appropriation for the operation and maintenance of the department or agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 981, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 52; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-5-8

.

35-5-9.
“General store” defined.

The term “general store”, as used in this chapter, shall be deemed to include the general store, drug store, and bakery at the state institutions in Cranston under the control of the department of corrections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 981, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 54; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-5-9

.

35-5-10.
Reimbursement of rotary funds for services provided to state agencies.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

35-5-5

, any rotary or rotating fund established for centralized services under the control of the department of administration, including information technology, capital asset management and maintenance and human resources, shall consist of, in addition to such sums as may be provided by appropriation for that purpose, the receipts and reimbursements accruing to the fund. Any state department or agency receiving or drawing services, goods, wares, or merchandise from these programs, or receiving benefits therefrom, shall reimburse the rotary fund for the cost. The reimbursement of the rotary fund shall be made by each department or agency at the close of each calendar month through a process established by the state controller to the order of the respective rotary fund. The state controller shall charge payments to the proper appropriation for the operation and maintenance of the benefitting department or agency. On or before October 15, 2017, and quarterly thereafter, the director of the department of administration shall provide a report to the speaker of the house and senate president, with copies to the chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees, detailing the fund activity for the previous quarter, including a breakdown of the fund activity of each department or agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 7, § 10.